Utah statutes.
58-37c-6.   Division duties.

The division shall be responsible for the licensing and reporting provisions of this chapter and those duties shall include:

(1)  providing for a system of licensure of regulated distributors and regulated purchasers;

(2)  refusing to renew a license or revoking, suspending, restricting, placing on probation, issuing a private or public letter of censure or reprimand, or imposing other appropriate action against a license;

(3)  with respect to the licensure and reporting provisions of this chapter, investigating or causing to be investigated any violation of this chapter by any person and to cause, when necessary, appropriate administrative action with respect to the license of that person;

(4)  presenting evidence obtained from investigations conducted by appropriate county attorneys and the Office of the Attorney General for civil or criminal prosecution or for administrative action against a licensee;

(5)  conducting hearings for the purpose of revoking, suspending, placing on probation, or imposing other appropriate administrative action against the license of regulated distributors or regulated purchasers in accordance with the provisions of Title 58, Chapter 1, Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Act, and Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act;

(6)  assisting all other law enforcement agencies of the state in enforcing all laws regarding controlled substance precursors;

(7)  specifying reports, frequency of reports, and conditions under which reports are to be submitted and to whom reports are to be submitted by regulated distributors and regulated purchasers with respect to transactions involving threshold amounts of controlled substance precursors; and

(8)  performing all other functions necessary to fulfill division duties and responsibilities as outlined under this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

